District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.12

Sunshine provisions.

Collective bargaining sessions between the District and employee organization representatives shall not be open to the public. All fact-finding proceedings under this subchapter shall be open to the public.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1712, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-618.12.
1973 Ed., § 1-347.12.